Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 4. Regulation of Sewage Discharges.

§ 62.1-44.18.
Sewerage systems, etc., under supervision of Board and Department of Environmental Quality; Board to regulate design specification and plans.

All sewerage systems and sewage treatment works shall be under the general supervision of the Board.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall, when requested, consult with and advise the authorities of cities, towns, sanitary districts, and any owner having or intending to have installed sewage treatment works as to the most appropriate type of treatment, but the Department shall not prepare plans, specifications, or detailed estimates of cost for any improvement of an existing or proposed sewage treatment works.

It shall be the duty of the owner of any such sewerage system or sewage treatment works from which sewage is being discharged into any state waters to furnish, when requested by the Board, information with regard to the quantities and character of the raw and treated sewage and the operation results obtained in the removal and disposal of organic matter and other pertinent information as is required.

The regulations of the Board shall govern the collection, conveyance, treatment and disposal of sewage. Such regulations shall be designed to protect the public health and promote the public welfare and may include, without limitation:

A requirement that the owner obtain a permit prior to the construction, installation, modification or operation of a sewerage system or treatment;

Criteria for the granting or denial of such permits;

Standards for the design, construction, installation, modification and operation of sewerage systems and treatment works;

Standards specifying the minimum distance between sewerage systems or treatment works and:

Public and private wells supplying water for human consumption,

Lakes and other impounded waters,

Streams and rivers,

Shellfish waters,

Ground waters,

Areas and places of human habitation, and

Property lines;

Standards as to the adequacy of an approved water supply;

A prohibition against the discharge of untreated sewage onto land or into waters of the Commonwealth; and

Criteria for determining the demonstrated ability of alternative onsite systems, which are not permitted through the then current sewage handling and disposal regulations, to treat and dispose of sewage as effectively as approved methods.

In addition to factors related to the Board’s responsibilities for the safe and sanitary treatment and disposal of sewage as they affect the public health and welfare, the Board shall, in establishing standards, give due consideration to economic costs of such standards in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, §§ 62-39, § 62.1-31; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1991, c. 194; 2003, c. 614.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 614, cl. 2, provides: “That the Sewage Collection and Treatment regulations promulgated by the Virginia Board of Health that are in effect as of the effective date of this act shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended or rescinded by the State Water Control Board pursuant to its authority under subsection D of §

62.1-44.18

of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 614, in subsection A, substituted “the Board” for “the State Department of Health and the Board jointly as prescribed in this article”; substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “State Department of Health” in subsection B; in subsection C, deleted “to the State Department of Health from time to time” following “Board,” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The State Department of Health shall furnish the Board with such available information as the Board requires”; and added subsections D and E.

Law Review.

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Granting of sewer discharge permits. —

Board had no basis for denying the company’s §

62.1-44.18

sewer discharge permit application and, therefore, should not have denied it. Subsection B of §

62.1-44.19

stated that the Board “shall approve” such application if it determined that minimum treatment requirements will be met and that the discharge would not result in violations of water quality standards, and since the record supported a finding on both of those items, the Board had to approve the permit the application. Captain's Cove Util. Co. v. State Water Control Bd., 74 Va. Cir. 253, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 275 (Accomack County Oct. 11, 2007), rev'd, No. 2735-07-1, 2008

Va. App. LEXIS 375

(Va. Ct. App. Aug. 5, 2008).

§ 62.1-44.18:1.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 194.

§ 62.1-44.18:2.
When Board may prohibit discharge; permits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Board shall have the authority to prohibit any present or proposed discharge of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes into any sewerage system or treatment works when it has determined that such discharge would threaten the public health and safety, or would substantially interfere or be incompatible with the treatment works, or would substantially interfere with usage of state waters as designated by the Board. Before making any such determination, the Board shall consult with and receive the advice of the State Department of Health.

The Board shall have the authority to issue permits which prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the discharge of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes may be made into any sewerage system or treatment works. The Board may revoke or amend any such permit for good cause and after proper hearing. Notwithstanding the requirement for notice and a hearing, the Board may, after consultation with the State Department of Health, summarily revoke or amend such permit when it determines that the permitted discharge poses a threat to the public health and safety, or is interfering substantially with the treatment works, or is grossly affecting usage of state waters as designated by the Board. In such case, the Board shall hold a hearing as soon as practicable but in no event later than twenty days after the revocation or amendment with reasonable notice to the owner as to the time and place thereof to affirm, modify, or rescind the summary revocation or amendment of such permit.

Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the Board to proceed against such owner directly under §

62.1-44.23

or §

62.1-44.32

after the Board has prohibited discharge, or after the Board has summarily amended or revoked the permit which authorized the discharge. If a proposed revocation or amendment of a permit is mutually agreeable to the Board and the owner, the hearing and notice thereof may be dispensed with.

History.

1976, c. 626.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 247, cl. 1 provides:
“That the State Water Control Board shall petition the Administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency to approve the designation of Smith Mountain Lake as a no-discharge zone for boat sewage. If such approval is granted, the Board shall prohibit the discharge from all vessels of any sewage into Smith Mountain Lake.” The federal EPA has approved the designation.

§ 62.1-44.18:3.
Permit for private sewerage facility; financial assurance; violations; waiver of filing.

No person shall operate a privately owned sewerage system or sewerage treatment works, including an LHS 120 facility, that discharges more than 1,000 gallons per day and less than 40,000 gallons per day without obtaining a Virginia Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit. Any owner of such a facility shall file with the Board a plan to abate, control, prevent, remove, or contain any substantial or imminent threat to public health or the environment that is reasonably likely to occur if such facility ceases operations. Such plan shall also include a demonstration of financial capability to implement the plan. Financial capability may be demonstrated by the creation of a trust fund, a submission of a bond, a corporate guarantee based upon audited financial statements, or such other instruments as the Board may deem appropriate. The Board may require that such plan and instruments be updated as appropriate.For the purposes of this section, “ceases operation” means to cease conducting the normal operation of a facility that is regulated under this chapter under circumstances where it would be reasonable to expect that such operation will not be resumed by the owner at the facility. The term shall not include the sale or transfer of a facility in the ordinary course of business or a permit transfer in accordance with Board regulations.Any person who ceases operations and who knowingly and willfully fails to implement a closure plan or to provide adequate funds for implementation of such plan shall, if such failure results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be liable to the Commonwealth and any political subdivision thereof for the costs incurred in abating, controlling, preventing, removing, or containing such harm or threat. This shall not in any way limit other recourse available to the Board.Any person who ceases operations and who knowingly and willfully fails to implement a closure plan or to provide adequate funds for implementation of such plan shall, if such failure results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial threat of significant harm to human health or the environment, be guilty of a Class 4 felony.

The Board may waive the filing of the plan required pursuant to subsection A for any person who operates a privately owned sewerage system or sewerage treatment works that was permitted prior to January 1, 2001, and discharges less than 5,000 gallons per day upon a finding that such person has not violated any regulation or order of the Board, any condition of a permit to operate the facility, or any provision of this chapter for a period of not less than five years; provided, that no waiver may be approved by the Board until after the governing body of the locality in which the facility is located approves the waiver after a public hearing. The Board may revoke such waiver at any time for good cause. Any person receiving a waiver who ceases operations shall, if such cessation of operation results in a significant harm or an imminent and substantial risk of significant harm to human health and the environment, be guilty of a Class 4 felony and liable to the Commonwealth and any political subdivision thereof, for the costs incurred in abating, controlling, preventing, removing, or containing such harm or threat.

The Department of Environmental Quality shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The Department shall identify by January 1, 2001, those facilities regulated under this section.

History.

2000, c. 69; 2001, c. 493.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 felony, see §

18.2-10

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 69, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Water Control Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 493 added present subsection B, and redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C.

§ 62.1-44.19.
Approval of sewerage systems and sewage treatment works.

Before any owner may erect, construct, open, expand or operate a sewerage system or sewage treatment works which will have a potential discharge or actual discharge to state waters, such owner shall file with the Board an application for a certificate in scope and detail satisfactory to the Board.

If the application involves a system or works from which there is or is to be a discharge to state waters, the application shall be given public notice by publication once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or city where the certificate is applied for or by such other means as the Board may prescribe. Before issuing the certificate, the Board shall consult with and give consideration to the written recommendations of the State Department of Health pertaining to the protection of public health. Upon completion of advertising, the Board shall determine if the application is complete, and if so, shall act upon it within 21 days of such determination. The Board shall approve such application if it determines that minimum treatment requirements will be met and that the discharge will not result in violations of water quality standards. If the Board disapproves the application, it shall state what modifications or changes, if any, will be required for approval.

After the certificate has been issued or amended by the Board, the owner shall acquire from the Department of Environmental Quality (i) authorization to construct the systems or works for which the Board has issued a discharge certificate and (ii) upon completion of construction, authorization to operate the sewerage system or sewage treatment works. These authorizations shall be obtained in accordance with regulations promulgated by the Board.

Any owner operating under a valid certificate issued by the Board who fails to meet water quality standards established by the Board solely as a result of a change in water quality standards or in the law shall provide the necessary facilities approved by the Department of Environmental Quality, in accordance with the provisions of subsection C of this section, within a reasonable time to meet such new requirements. The Board may amend such certificate, or revoke it and issue a new one to reflect such facilities after proper hearing, with at least 30 days’ notice to the owner of the time, place and purpose thereof. If such revocation or amendment of a certificate is mutually agreeable to the Board and the owner involved, the hearing and notice may be dispensed with.

The Board shall revoke the certificate in case of a failure to comply with all such requirements and may issue a special order under subdivisions (8a), (8b), and (8c) of §

62.1-44.15

.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-33; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1976, c. 661; 1991, c. 194; 2003, c. 614.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1991, c. 194, cl. 3 provides: “That the joint sewage regulations promulgated by the Board of Health and the State Water Control Board shall remain in effect until superceded by new regulations promulgated by the Board of Health or the State Water Control Board as appropriate.”

Acts 2003, c. 614, cl. 2, provides: “That the Sewage Collection and Treatment regulations promulgated by the Virginia Board of Health that are in effect as of the effective date of this act shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended or rescinded by the State Water Control Board pursuant to its authority under subsection D of §

62.1-44.18

of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 614 substituted “21” for “twenty-one” in subsection B; in subsection C, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “State Department of Health” in the first sentence, substituted “Board” for “State Board of Health under §

32.1-164

” in the second sentence, and deleted a former third sentence, which read: “The State Department of Health shall promptly notify the Board when such authorizations are granted”; and in subsection D, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “State Department of Health” and “30” for “thirty.”

§ 62.1-44.19:1.
Prohibiting sewage discharge under certain conditions in certain cities.

If the Board or the State Department of Health determines that a receiving stream in the City of Virginia Beach is being polluted by the sewage discharge from a private or public sewage utility, and that it is possible to connect such utility to the sewage system of a municipality, sewage treatment authority, or sanitation district, the Board may order the utility in the City of Virginia Beach to stop such discharge into the receiving stream. The utility shall discontinue such discharge within one year of such order by providing either (i) adequate treatment as determined by the Board or the State Department of Health or (ii) a connection to central facilities.

History.

1972, c. 840; 2022, c. 235.

Editor’s note.

This section, authorizing the State Water Control Board to prohibit the discharge of sewage into a receiving stream in Virginia Beach upon a determination by the State Department of Health or the Board that the stream is being polluted by the discharge, was enacted by Acts 1972, c. 840. In furtherance of the general policy of the Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application, this section, which is limited in its purpose and scope, is not set out here, but attention is called to it by this reference.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 235 rewrote the section, which read: “Whenever the State Department of Health or the State Water Control Board determines that a receiving stream in Virginia Beach is being polluted by the sewage discharge from a private or public sewage utility, and that it is possible to connect such utility to the sewage system of a municipality, sewage treatment authority, or sanitation district, the Board is hereby empowered to order the utility in Virginia Beach to stop such discharge into the receiving stream. The utility shall discontinue the said discharge either by adequate treatment as determined the State Department of Health or Water Control Board, or by a connection to central facilities, either of which is to occur within one year.”

§ 62.1-44.19:2.
Additional requirements on sewage discharge in the Cities of Chesapeake, Hampton, Newport News, Norfolk and Virginia Beach.

Beginning January 1, 1973, every sewage pumping station in the Cities of Chesapeake, Hampton, Newport News, Norfolk, and Virginia Beach shall:

Have adequate personnel on call at all times, each of whom may serve multiple pumping stations, as prescribed by the Chesapeake, Hampton, Newport News, Norfolk, or Virginia Beach City Council, respectively;

As prescribed by the Board, be inspected at such intervals and maintain such records of inspection. Such records shall be open for review by the Board or its representatives at any reasonable time it designates;

Have an automatic alarm system installed to give immediate warning of any pump station failure;

Have emergency pump connections installed and have portable pumps available to pump sewage to downstream sewer lines during any period of pump station failure;

Not use, except in an emergency pursuant to regulations as provided by the Board, any overflow line from any such pumping station except as provided in subdivision 4.

Any sewerage system within the City of Chesapeake, Hampton, Newport News, Norfolk, or Virginia Beach that complies with the requirements of this section is deemed to meet the requirements for continuous operability as set forth in regulations of the Board or the State Department of Health.

History.

1972, c. 840; 1975, c. 373; 1976, c. 188; 2022, c. 235.

Editor’s note.

This section, regulating sewage pumping stations in Virginia Beach, was enacted by Acts 1972, c. 840. In furtherance of the general policy of the Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application, this section, which is limited in its purpose and scope, is not set out here, but attention is called to it by this reference. This section was also amended by Acts 1975, c. 373, and Acts 1976, c. 188, which latter act made the section applicable to the Cities of Chesapeake, Newport News, Hampton and Norfolk as well as Virginia Beach.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 235 added the subsection designations and made stylistic changes.